Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-263
Distributions before withdrawal and dissolution.

Except as otherwise provided in sections 67-263 to 67-270, a partner is entitled to receive distributions from a limited partnership before his or her withdrawal from the limited partnership and before the dissolution and winding up thereof to the extent and at the times or upon the happening of the events specified in the partnership agreement.

Laws 1981, LB 272, § 31;

Laws 1989, LB 482, § 37.